Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1023
State agencies, boards, and commissions; flood plain management duties.

(1) All state agencies, boards, and commissions shall take preventive action to minimize flood hazards and losses in connection with state-owned and state-financed buildings, roads, and other facilities, and shall take such steps as are necessary to insure compliance with the minimum standards adopted by the department in accordance with subdivision (5) of section 31-1017 when such facilities are being located or constructed in any area where no local government is enforcing flood plain management regulations pursuant to section 31-1019 or 31-1021. If a local government with jurisdiction over the land upon which any such facility is to be located or constructed is enforcing flood plain management regulations pursuant to section 31-1019 or 31-1021, the state agency, board, or commission locating or constructing such facility shall comply with such regulations unless such compliance is specifically waived by the department.

(2) The department shall assist state agencies, boards, and commissions in determining and evaluating flood hazards and alternative flood protective measures and shall establish by rule or regulation, standards and procedures to govern its review of proposed state-owned and state-financed facilities not subject to local flood plain management regulations. Such standards and procedures shall meet the minimum criteria necessary to maintain the state's eligibility for flood insurance under the national flood insurance program.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 626, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 84.